Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 323, O.S.L.
2022, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 283, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 1-125), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-125. A. As used in this section:
1. "Sex" means the physical condition of being male or female
based on genetics and physiology, as identified on the individual's
original birth certificate has the same meaning as provided in
paragraph 8 of Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. "Multiple occupancy restroom or changing area" means an area
in a public school or public charter school building designed or
designated to be used by more than one individual at a time, where
individuals may be in various stages of undress in the presence of
other individuals. The term may include but is not limited to a
school restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower room;
3. "Coach" means a person employed by a public school district
or public charter school who is involved in the teaching or training
of students participating in a school-sponsored athletic activity;
and
4. "School-sponsored athletic activity" means a sporting event
that is supported and affiliated with the school such as practices,
games, matches, and tournaments; and
5. "Sleeping quarters" means a room containing a bed and in
which more than one individual is housed overnight.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. To ensure privacy and safety, each public school and public
charter school that serves students in prekindergarten through
twelfth grades in this state shall require every multiple occupancy
restroom or, changing area, and sleeping quarters designated as
follows:
1. For the exclusive use of the male sex; or
2. For the exclusive use of the female sex.
C. Each public school or public charter school in this state
shall provide a reasonable accommodation to any individual who does
not wish to comply with the provisions of subsection B of this
section. A reasonable accommodation shall be access to a single-
occupancy restroom or changing room.
D. During any activity or event authorized by a public school
or public charter school where students share sleeping quarters, no
student shall be required to share sleeping quarters with a member
of the opposite sex, unless such person is a member of the same
family, such as a parent, guardian, sibling, or grandparent.
E. In any other facility or setting in a public school or
public charter school where a person may be in a state of undress in
the presence of others, school personnel shall provide separate,
private areas designated for use by persons based on their sex.
Except as provided in subsection F of this section, no person shall
enter such private areas unless he or she is a member of the
designated sex.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
individuals entering a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area
designated for use by the opposite sex when entering in any of the
following circumstances:
1. For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes;
2. To render emergency medical assistance; or
3. If a suitable meeting room or area is not available, a coach
may enter a locker room before, during, or after a school-sponsored
athletic activity, provided:
a. all students present are fully clothed,
b. the coach shall be accompanied by at least one
additional adult at all times, and
c. if the coach is the opposite sex of the students
present, the coach shall be accompanied by at least
one adult of the same sex as the students present.
The adult shall not be a current high school student.
E. G. 1. Each school district board of education and public
charter school governing board shall adopt a policy to provide
disciplinary action for individuals who refuse to comply with the
provisions of this section.
2. No school district board of education or charter school
governing board shall adopt a policy contrary to the provisions of
this section.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. H. Upon a finding of noncompliance with the provisions of
subsections B, C, and D through F of this section by the State Board
of Education, the noncompliant school district or public charter
school shall receive a five percent (5%) decrease in state funding
for the school district or public charter school for the fiscal year
following the year of noncompliance.
G. I. A parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in and
physically attending a public school district or public charter
school shall have a cause of action against the public school
district or public charter school for noncompliance with the
provisions of subsections B, C, and D through F of this section.
H. J. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 401 of Title 25, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section:
1. "Changing room" means a room or area in which a person may
be in a state of undress in the presence of others, including a
locker room or shower room;
2. "Coach" means a person employed by a public institution of
higher education who is involved in the teaching or training of
students participating in an institution-sponsored athletic
activity;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. "Covered entity" includes a:
a. public institution of higher education which means any
institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education or technology center school overseen by the
State Board of Career and Technology Education,
b. public building which means a building owned or
operated by a governmental subdivision of the state,
and
c. domestic violence shelter which means a state-operated
or state-funded facility that provides services,
including food, housing, counseling, and assistance,
to victims of domestic violence or abuse and their
minor dependent children in this state;
4. "Institution-sponsored athletic activity" means a sporting
event that is supported and affiliated with a public institution of
higher education such as practices, games, matches, and tournaments;
5. "Multi-occupancy" means a space that is designed for use by
multiple persons simultaneously;
6. "Restroom" means a room that includes one or more toilets or
urinals; and
7. "Sleeping quarters" means a room containing a bed and in
which more than one individual is housed overnight.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. 1. A covered entity shall designate each multi-occupancy
restroom, changing room, and sleeping quarters for the exclusive use
of:
a. females, or
b. males.
2. Every restroom or changing room within a covered entity that
is designated for females or males shall only be used by members of
that sex. No individual shall enter a restroom or changing room
that is designated for females or males unless he or she is a member
of the designated sex.
3. The covered entity shall take reasonable steps to provide
individuals with privacy in restrooms, changing rooms, and sleeping
quarters from members of the opposite sex.
4. This section shall not apply to an individual who enters a
restroom or changing room designated for the opposite sex in any of
the following circumstances, provided that the restroom or changing
room is not in use:
a. for custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes,
b. to render medical assistance,
c. to render assistance by law enforcement,
d. to provide services or render aid during a natural
disaster, a declared emergency, or when necessary to
prevent a serious threat to good order or safety, or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

e. if a suitable meeting room or area is not available, a
coach may enter a locker room before, during, or after
an institution-sponsored athletic activity, provided:
(1) all students present are fully clothed,
(2) the coach shall be accompanied by at least one
additional adult at all times, and
(3) if the coach is the opposite sex of the students
present, the coach shall be accompanied by at
least one adult of the same sex as the students
present.
5. During any activity or event authorized by a public
institution of higher education where students share sleeping
quarters, no student shall be required to share sleeping quarters
with a member of the opposite sex, unless such person is a member of
the same family, such as a parent, guardian, sibling, or
grandparent.
6. In any other facility or setting in a public institution of
higher education where a person may be in a state of undress in the
presence of others, institution personnel shall provide separate,
private areas designated for use by persons based on their sex.
Except as provided in subsection (4), no person shall enter said
private areas unless he or she is a member of the designated sex.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. A public institution of higher education that offers housing
for student residents shall provide students the option to be housed
only with persons of the same sex.
8. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
covered entity from:
a. adopting policies necessary to accommodate persons
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act,
young children in need of assistance, or elderly
persons requiring aid,
b. establishing single-occupancy restrooms, changing
rooms, or sleeping quarters, or family restrooms,
changing rooms, or sleeping quarters, or
c. redesignating a multi-occupancy restroom, changing
room, or sleeping quarters designated for exclusive
use by one sex to a designation for exclusive use by
the opposite sex.
C. 1. An individual who, while accessing a restroom or
changing room designated for use by his or her sex, encounters a
person of the opposite sex in that restroom or changing room has a
private cause of action for declaratory and injunctive relief
against the covered entity if the covered entity:
a. provided the person permission to use a restroom or
changing room of the opposite sex, or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the person
of the opposite sex from using the restroom or
changing room of the opposite sex.
2. An individual who is required by the covered entity to share
sleeping quarters with a person of the opposite sex has a private
cause of action for declaratory and injunctive relief against the
covered entity.
3. All civil actions brought pursuant to this section shall be
initiated within two (2) years after the violation occurred. An
individual aggrieved under this section who prevails in court may
recover reasonable attorney fees and costs from the offending
covered entity.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES
April 20, 2026 - DO PASS










SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3242 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)